Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.220

Notice published of moneys in escrow.

The department, at least once every six months for five years from the date it receives such moneys, shall cause to have published a legal notice in newspapers of general circulation in the county wherein the crime was committed and in counties contiguous to such county advising such victims that such escrow moneys are available to satisfy money judgments pursuant to this section. For crimes committed in a city located within a county having a population of one million or more, the notice provided for in this section shall be in newspapers having general circulation in such city. The department may, in its discretion, provide for such additional notice as it deems necessary.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.